Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 14 Georgia Long-term Care Background Check Program

31-7-350.
Short title; purpose.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Long-term Care Background Check Program.”

The purpose of this article is to establish the minimum standards for the Georgia Long-term Care Background Check Program for conducting criminal background checks of owners, applicants for employment, and direct access employees at certain facilities.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-350

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 1-4/SB 406.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective October 1, 2019.

31-7-351.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Applicant” means an individual applying to be a direct access employee at a facility.

“Conviction” means a finding or verdict of guilty or a plea of guilty regardless of whether an appeal of the conviction has been sought.

“Crime” means commission of:

Any of the following offenses:

A violation of Code Section 16-5-70;

A violation of Code Section 16-5-101;

A violation of Code Section 16-5-102;

A violation of Code Section 16-6-4;

A violation of Code Section 16-6-5;

A violation of Code Section 16-6-5.1; or

A violation of Code Section 30-5-8;

A felony violation of:

Chapter 5, 6, 8, 9, or 13 of Title 16;

Code Section 16-4-1;

Code Section 16-7-2; or

Subsection (f) of Code Section 31-7-12.1; or

Any other offense committed in another jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would be deemed to constitute an offense identified in this paragraph without regard to its designation elsewhere.

“Criminal background check” means a search of the criminal records maintained by GCIC and the Federal Bureau of Investigation to determine whether an owner, applicant, or employee has a criminal record.

“Criminal record” means any of the following:

Conviction of a crime;

Arrest, charge, and sentencing for a crime when:

A plea of nolo contendere was entered to the crime;

First offender treatment without adjudication of guilt was granted to the crime; or

Adjudication or sentence was otherwise withheld or not entered for the crime; or

Arrest and charges for a crime if the charge is pending, unless the time for prosecuting such crime has expired pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 17.

Such term shall not include an owner, applicant, or employee for which at least ten years have elapsed from the date of his or her criminal background check since the completion of all of the terms of his or her sentence; provided, however, that such ten-year period or exemption shall never apply to any crime identified in subsection (j) of Code Section 42-8-60.

“Direct access” means having, or expecting to have, duties that involve routine personal contact with a patient, resident, or client, including face-to-face contact, hands-on physical assistance, verbal cuing, reminding, standing by or monitoring or activities that require the person to be routinely alone with the patient’s, resident’s, or client’s property or access to such property or financial information such as the patient’s, resident’s, or client’s checkbook, debit and credit cards, resident trust funds, banking records, stock accounts, or brokerage accounts.

“Employee” means any individual who has direct access and who is hired by a facility through employment, or through a contract with such facility, including, but not limited to, housekeepers, maintenance personnel, dieticians, and any volunteer who has duties that are equivalent to the duties of an employee providing such services. Such term shall not include an individual who contracts with the facility, whether personally or through a company, to provide utility, construction, communications, accounting, quality assurance, human resource management, information technology, legal, or other services if the contracted services are not directly related to providing services to a patient, resident, or client of the facility. Such term shall not include any health care provider, including, but not limited to, physicians, dentists, nurses, and pharmacists who are licensed by the Georgia Composite Medical Board, the Georgia Board of Dentistry, the Georgia Board of Nursing, or the State Board of Pharmacy.

“Facility” means:

A personal care home required to be licensed or permitted under Code Section 31-7-12;

An assisted living community required to be licensed under Code Section 31-7-12.2;

A private home care provider required to be licensed under Article 13 of this chapter;

A home health agency as licensed pursuant to Code Section 31-7-151;

A provider of hospice care as licensed pursuant to Code Section 31-7-173;

A nursing home, skilled nursing facility, or intermediate care home licensed pursuant to rules of the department;

An adult day care facility licensed pursuant to rules of the department; or

An adult residential mental health program licensed pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 3 of Title 37.

“Fingerprint records check determination” means a satisfactory or unsatisfactory determination by the department based upon fingerprint based national criminal history information.

“GCIC” means the Georgia Crime Information Center established under Article 2 of Chapter 3 of Title 35.

“License” means the document issued by the department to authorize a facility to operate.

“Owner” in the context of a nursing home or intermediate care home means an individual who is not an “excluded party” as such term is defined in Code Section 31-7-3.3, otherwise such term means an individual or any person affiliated with a corporation, partnership, or association with 10 percent or greater ownership interest in a facility who performs one or more of the following:

Purports to or exercises authority of a facility;

Applies to operate or operates a facility;

Maintains an office on the premises of a facility;

Resides at a facility;

Has direct access at a facility;

Provides direct personal supervision of facility personnel by being immediately available to provide assistance and direction when such facility services are being provided; or

Enters into a contract to acquire ownership of a facility.

“Records check application” means fingerprints in such form and of such quality as prescribed by GCIC under standards adopted by the Federal Bureau of Investigation and a records search fee to be established by the department by rule and regulation, payable in such form as the department may direct to cover the cost of obtaining a criminal background check.

“Registry check” means a review of the nurse aide registry provided for in Code Section 31-2-14, the state sexual offender registry, and the List of Excluded Individuals and Entities as authorized in Sections 1128 and 1156 of the federal Social Security Act, as it existed on February 1, 2018, or any other registry useful for the administration of this article as specified by rules of the department.

“Satisfactory determination” means a written determination that an individual for whom a criminal background check was performed was found to have no criminal record.

“Unsatisfactory determination” means a written determination that an individual for whom a criminal background check was performed was found to have a criminal record.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-350

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 570, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 806, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 8-13/HB 1176; Ga. L. 2013, p. 524, § 3-4/HB 78; Code 1981, §

31-7-351

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 1-4/SB 406; Ga. L. 2022, p. 587, § 2/HB 1069.

The 2018 amendment,

effective October 1, 2019, redesignated former Code Section 31-7-350 as present Code Section 31-7-351, and rewrote this Code section.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “or” from the end of subparagraph (8)(F), substituted “; or” for a period at the end of subparagraph (8)(G), and added subparagraph (8)(H).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 899, § 9-1(a)/HB 1176, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2012, and shall apply to offenses which occur on or after that date.
Any offense occurring before July 1, 2012, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior conviction for the purpose of imposing a sentence that provides for a different penalty for a subsequent conviction for the same type of offense, of whatever degree or level, pursuant to this Act.”

This Code section formerly pertained to
a request for criminal record check and employment application form notice. This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1995, p. 570, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 806, § 2 and was repealed by Ga. L. 2018, p. 611,
§ 1-4/SB 406, effective October 1, 2019.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 153 (2001).

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 290 (2012).

For note, “Give It to Me, I’m Worth It:
The Need to Amend Georgia’s Record Restriction Statute to Provide Ex-Offenders with a Second Chance in the Employment Sector,” see 52 Ga. L. Rev. 267 (2017).

31-7-352.
Registry check required; validation of licensing.

A registry check of an owner, applicant, or employee shall be required prior to a criminal background check and shall be initiated by the applicable facility. A registry check shall be performed by such facility and may include reviewing registries of any other states in which the applicant previously resided. If an applicant has not resided in this state for at least two years, the facility shall conduct registry checks of each state in which the applicant resided for the previous two years, as represented by such applicant or as otherwise determined by the applicable facility.

If applicable to an owner, applicant, or employee, a query of available information maintained by the Georgia Composite Medical Board, the Secretary of State, or other applicable licensing boards shall be conducted prior to a criminal background check to validate that such individual’s professional license is in good standing.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 31-7-359, nothing in this Code section shall be construed to limit the responsibility or ability of a facility to screen owners, applicants, or employees through additional methods.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-352

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 570, § 1; Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 1-4/SB 406.

The 2018 amendment,

effective October 1, 2019, rewrote this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to
a request for criminal record check and employment application form notice. This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1995, p. 570, § 1 and was repealed by Ga. L. 2018, p. 611,
§ 1-4/SB 406, effective October 1, 2019.

31-7-353.
Records check application; transmittal of fingerprints; penalties for unauthorized release or disclosure of information.

Accompanying any application for a new license, the candidate facility shall furnish to the department a records check application for each owner and each applicant and employee. In lieu of such records check application, such facility may submit evidence, satisfactory to the department, that within the immediately preceding 12 months each owner and each applicant or employee received a satisfactory determination that includes a records check clearance date that is no more than 12 months old, or that any owner, applicant, or employee whose fingerprint records check determination revealed a criminal record of any kind has subsequently received a satisfactory determination. The time frames set forth in this subsection shall not apply when fingerprints have been retained by the department due to its participation in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33.

On or before January 1, 2021, each owner and employee of a currently licensed facility shall furnish to the department a records check application. In lieu of such records check application, a facility may submit evidence, satisfactory to the department, that within the immediately preceding 12 months each owner and employee received a satisfactory determination. The time frames set forth in this subsection shall not apply when fingerprints have been retained by the department due to its participation in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33.

Upon receipt of fingerprints submitted pursuant to a records check application, GCIC shall promptly transmit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and shall promptly conduct a search of its own records and records to which it has access. Within ten days after receiving fingerprints acceptable to GCIC, it shall notify the department in writing of any criminal record or if there is no such finding. After a search of Federal Bureau of Investigation records and fingerprints and upon receipt of the bureau’s report, the department shall make a determination about an owner’s, applicant’s, or employee’s criminal record.

Neither GCIC, the department, any law enforcement agency, nor the employees of any such entities shall be responsible for the accuracy of information nor have any liability for defamation, invasion of privacy, negligence, or any other claim in connection with any dissemination of information or determination based thereon pursuant to this Code section.

All information received from the Federal Bureau of Investigation or GCIC shall be used exclusively for employment or licensure purposes and shall not be released or otherwise disclosed to any other person or agency. All such information collected by the department shall be maintained by the department pursuant to laws regarding and rules or regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and GCIC, as is applicable. Penalties for the unauthorized release or disclosure of any such information shall be as prescribed pursuant to laws regarding and rules or regulations of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and GCIC, as is applicable.

If the department is participating in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall be authorized to retain fingerprints obtained pursuant to this Code section for such program and the department shall notify the individual whose fingerprints were taken of the parameters of such retention.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-353

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 806, § 3; Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 1-4/SB 406; Ga. L. 2019, p. 308, § 1/HB 91; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 31/SB 52.

The 2018 amendment,

effective October 1, 2019, rewrote this Code section.

The 2019 amendments.

The first 2019 amendment, effective October 1, 2019, in subsection (a), substituted “owner and each applicant” for “owner, applicant,” near the middle of the second sentence and added the third sentence; added the third sentence in subsection (b); substituted “records” for “record” near the middle of the first sentence in subsection (c); and added subsection (f). The second 2019 amendment, effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “records check application” for “record check application” in the first sentence of subsection (c).

Cross references.

Equal protection, U.S. Const., amend. 14 and Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. II.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to
a request for criminal record check and employment application form notice. This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1995, p. 570, § 1 and was repealed by Ga. L. 2018, p. 611,
§ 1-4/SB 406, effective October 1, 2019.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 enactment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 153 (2001).

31-7-354.
Consent to background checks; certain results of background check barring employment; rights of owner, applicant, or employee.

An applicant seeking employment with a facility or a current employee at such facility shall consent to a national and state background check that includes a registry check, a check of information maintained by a professional licensing board, if applicable, and a criminal background check.

An individual required to submit to a registry check and criminal background check shall not be employed by, contracted with, or allowed to work as an employee at a facility if:

The individual appears on a registry check;

There is a substantiated finding of neglect, abuse, or misappropriation of property by a state or federal agency pursuant to an investigation conducted in accordance with 42 U.S.C. Section 1395i-3 or 1396r as it existed on February 1, 2018;

The individual’s professional license, if applicable, is not in good standing; or

The facility receives notice from the department that the individual has been found to have an unsatisfactory determination.

An individual whose professional license is not in good standing may be employed by a facility in a position wherein his or her duties do not require professional licensure, provided that he or she provides a fingerprint record check determination in the same manner as an applicant.

An owner, applicant, or employee may:

Obtain information concerning the accuracy of his or her criminal record, and the department shall refer such individual to the appropriate state or federal law enforcement agency that was involved in the arrest or conviction;

Challenge the finding that he or she is the true subject of the results from a registry check, and the department shall refer such individual to the agency responsible for maintaining such registry; and

Appeal his or her disqualifying unsatisfactory determination pursuant to Code Section 31-7-358.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-354

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 1-4/SB 406.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective October 1, 2019.

31-7-355.
Personnel files; when department may require background check; result of unsatisfactory determination.

A personnel file for each employee shall be maintained by the applicable facility. Such files shall be available for inspection by the appropriate enforcement authorities but shall otherwise be maintained to protect the confidentiality of the information contained therein and shall include, but not be limited to, evidence of each employee’s satisfactory determination, registry check, and licensure check, if applicable.

As used in this subsection, the term:

“Abuse” means the willful infliction of injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation, or punishment with resulting physical harm, pain, or mental anguish. Such term includes the deprivation by an individual of goods or services that are necessary to attain or maintain physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being. Such term includes verbal abuse, sexual abuse, physical abuse, and mental abuse, including abuse facilitated or enabled through the use of technology.

“Willful” means acting deliberately, not that there is an intention to inflict injury or harm.

The department may require a criminal background check on any owner of or employee at a facility during the course of an abuse investigation involving such owner or employee or if the department receives information that such owner or employee was arrested for a crime. In such instances, the department shall require the owner or employee to furnish two full sets of fingerprints which the department shall submit to GCIC together with appropriate fees collected from the owner or employee. Upon receipt thereof, GCIC shall promptly transmit one set of fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a search of bureau records and an appropriate report and shall retain the other set and promptly conduct a search of its own records and records to which it has access. GCIC shall notify the department in writing of any unsatisfactory finding, including but not limited to any criminal record obtained through the fingerprint records check determination or if there is no such finding. If the department is participating in the program described in subparagraph (a)(1)(F) of Code Section 35-3-33, the Georgia Bureau of Investigation and the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall be authorized to retain fingerprints obtained pursuant to this Code section for such program and the department shall notify the individual whose fingerprints were taken of the parameters of such retention.

When the department determines that an applicant or employee has an unsatisfactory determination, the department shall notify the facility that such applicant or employee is ineligible to hire or employ and the facility shall take the necessary steps so that such employee is no longer employed at the facility; provided, however, that a facility may retain a current employee during the period of his or her administrative appeal.

When the department determines that an owner has an unsatisfactory determination, the department shall notify such owner of the ineligible status for ownership and shall take the necessary steps to revoke the facility’s license.

An owner, applicant, or employee may appeal his or her disqualifying unsatisfactory determination pursuant to Code Section 31-7-358.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-355

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 1-4/SB 406; Ga. L. 2019, p. 308, § 2/HB 91; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 31/SB 52.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective October 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendments.

The first 2019 amendment, effective October 1, 2019, added the last sentence in paragraph (b)(2). The second 2019 amendment, effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “subsection” for “paragraph” in paragraph (b)(1), revised punctuation in subparagraph (b)(1)(A), and substituted “his or her” for “their” in paragraph (b)(5).

31-7-356.
Facility’s failure to comply with provisions; penalty.

A facility that does not terminate an employee who has been found to have an unsatisfactory determination or failed a registry check shall be liable for a civil monetary penalty in the amount of the lesser of $10,000.00 or $500.00 for each day that a violation occurs. The daily civil monetary penalty shall be imposed only from the time the facility knew or should have known that it employed an individual with a criminal record and until the date such individual’s employment is terminated.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-356

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 1-4/SB 406.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective October 1, 2019.

31-7-357.
Required notice on application form.

Each application form provided by a facility to an applicant shall conspicuously state the following: “FOR THIS TYPE OF EMPLOYMENT, STATE LAW REQUIRES A NATIONAL AND STATE BACKGROUND CHECK AS A CONDITION OF EMPLOYMENT.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-357

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 1-4/SB 406.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective October 1, 2019.

31-7-358.
License revocation or withholding; additional requirements.

An owner of a facility with an unsatisfactory determination or whose name appears on a registry check shall not operate or hold a license, and the department shall revoke the license of any owner operating such facility or refuse to issue a license to any owner operating such facility if such owner has an unsatisfactory determination or is on a registry check.

Prior to approving any license for a facility and periodically as established by the department by rule, the department shall require each owner and employee to submit to a registry check and criminal background check pursuant to Code Sections 31-7-352 and 31-7-353.

An employee or applicant who received an unsatisfactory determination or whose name appears on a registry check shall be eligible to appeal such determination pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

In a hearing held pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the hearing officer shall consider in mitigation the length of time since the crime was committed, the absence of additional criminal charges, the circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime, and other indicia of rehabilitation.

The department’s determination regarding an owner’s unsatisfactory criminal background check, or any action by the department revoking or refusing to grant a license based on such determination, shall constitute a contested case for purposes of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” except that any hearing required to be held pursuant thereto may be held reasonably expeditiously after such determination or action by the department.

In a hearing held pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the hearing officer shall consider in mitigation the length of time since the crime was committed, the absence of additional criminal charges, the circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime, other indicia of rehabilitation, the facility’s history of compliance with the regulations, and the owner’s involvement with the licensed facility in arriving at a decision as to whether the criminal record requires the denial or revocation of the license to operate the facility. When a hearing is required, at least 30 days prior to such hearing, the hearing officer shall notify the office of the prosecuting attorney who initiated the prosecution of the crime in question in order to allow the prosecuting attorney to object to a possible determination that the conviction would not be a bar for the grant or continuation of a license as contemplated within this Code section. If objections are made, the hearing officer shall take such objections into consideration.

The requirements of this Code section are supplemental to any requirements for a license imposed by Article 1 of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-358

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 1-4/SB 406.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective October 1, 2019.

31-7-359.
Liability for civil damages; sovereign immunity not waived.

No person, including the department, a facility, or an individual acting on behalf of such entities, shall be liable for civil damages or be subject to any claim, demand, cause of action, or proceeding of any nature as a result of actions taken in good faith to comply with this article, including the disqualification of an applicant from employment on the basis of a disqualifying crime.

A facility that has obtained a satisfactory determination on an owner, applicant, or employee in accordance with this article, or confirmation that such owner, applicant, or employee has obtained a favorable final appeal decision under Code Section 31-7-358, shall be immune from liability for claims of negligent hiring when such claims are based upon the criminal record of such owner, applicant, or employee, even when the information contained in the criminal background check used by the department is later determined to have been incomplete or inaccurate; provided, however, that such immunity shall not preclude the liability of a facility concerning claims based on information beyond the scope of the criminal record and satisfactory determination about the owner, applicant, or employee which the facility knew or should have known.

When a facility has obtained a satisfactory determination on an owner, applicant, or employee, there shall be a rebuttable presumption of due care for claims of negligent hiring, negligent retention, or other similar claims to the extent such claims are based upon an owner’s, applicant’s, or employee’s criminal record.

Nothing in this article shall require a facility to conduct any other type of criminal history check of an owner, applicant, or employee, and a facility shall not be held liable for claims of negligent hiring, negligent retention, or other similar claims based solely or in part on its failure to conduct other types of criminal history checks.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to waive the sovereign immunity of the state, the department, or any other entity of the state.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-359

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 1-4/SB 406.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective October 1, 2019.

31-7-360.
Rules and regulations.

The department shall promulgate written rules and regulations related to the requirements and implementation of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-354

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-25/SB 433; Code 1981, §

31-7-360

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 1-4/SB 406.

The 2018 amendment,

effective October 1, 2019, redesignated former Code Section 31-7-354 as present Code Section 31-7-360; substituted “department shall promulgate written rules” for “Department of Community Health shall be authorized to enforce this article and to promulgate rules”
near the beginning; and inserted “and implementation” near the end.

31-7-361.
Transfer of responsibilities, rights, and personnel between departments.

Effective July 1, 2009, all matters relating to facility licensing and employee criminal background checks for personal care homes pursuant to Article 11 of this chapter as it existed on June 30, 2009, shall be transferred from the Department of Human Services to the department.

The rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties of parties to contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions entered into before July 1, 2009, by the Department of Human Resources which relate to the functions transferred to the department pursuant to this Code section shall continue to exist; and none of these rights, privileges, entitlements, and duties are impaired or diminished by reason of the transfer of the functions to the department. In all such instances, the department shall be substituted for the Department of Human Resources, and the department shall succeed to the rights and duties under such contracts, leases, agreements, and other transactions.

All persons employed by the Department of Human Resources in capacities which relate to the functions transferred to the department pursuant to this Code section on June 30, 2009, shall, on July 1, 2009, become employees of the department in similar capacities, as determined by the commissioner of community health. Such employees shall be subject to the employment practices and policies of the department on and after July 1, 2009, but the compensation and benefits of such transferred employees shall not be reduced as a result of such transfer. Employees who are subject to the rules of the State Personnel Board and who are transferred to the department shall retain all existing rights under such rules. Retirement rights of such transferred employees existing under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or other public retirement systems on June 30, 2009, shall not be impaired or interrupted by the transfer of such employees and membership in any such retirement system shall continue in the same status possessed by the transferred employees on June 30, 2009. Accrued annual and sick leave possessed by said employees on June 30, 2009, shall be retained by said employees as employees of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-361

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 1-4/SB 406.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective October 1, 2019.